Florida, session 2026, HB4033.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1 of chapter 59-1698, Laws of
Florida, as amended, is amended to read:
Section 1. DEFINITIONS. The following words and phrases
shall mean:
1. Children - Persons related to the operator of a
facility regulated under this act under 13 years of age, and all
other persons under 18 years of age.
2. Family Day Care Home - An occupied residence in which
custodial care is rendered to one to six children, inclusive,
and for which the owner or operator receives a payment, fee, or
grant for any of the children receiving care, whether or not
operating for profit, subject to the exemptions contained in
Section 9. The number of children receiving care shall never
exceed the number of children allowed by the Florida Statutes
and by administrative rules of the Florida Department of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4033 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4033 2026 Legislature
Children and Families.
3. Large Family Child Care Home - An occupied residence in
which custodial care is regularly provided for children, and for
which the owner or operator receives a payment, fee, or grant
for any of the children receiving care, whether or not operated
for profit, and which has at least two full-time child care
personnel on the premises during the hours of operation. One of
the full-time child care personnel must be the owner or occupant
of the residence. A large family child care home must first have
operated as a licensed family day care home for 2 years, with an
operator who has had a child development associate credential or
its equivalent for 1 year, before seeking licensure as a large
family child care home. The number of children receiving care
shall never exceed the number of children allowed by the Florida
Statutes and by administrative rules of the Florida Department
of Children and Families A large family child care home shall be
allowed to provide care for one of the following groups of
children, which shall include those children under 13 years of
age who are related to the caregiver:
a. A maximum of eight children from birth to 24 months of
age.
b. A maximum of 12 children with no more than four
children under 24 months of age.
4. Child Care Facility - Any building or shelter in which
custodial care is rendered to six or more children, and for
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4033 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4033 2026 Legislature
which the owner or operator receives a payment, fee, or grant
for any of the children receiving care, whether or not operating
for profit, or which is held out to the public to be an
establishment which regularly provides child custodial services.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4033 -01-er